Louisiana, session 2026, HB526.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Civil Code Article 2315.14 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
Art. 2315.14. Damage caps; general damages
A. Except as otherwise provided in this Article, general damages shall not
be awarded in a delictual action in an amount in excess of five hundred thousand
dollars, regardless of the number of parties against whom the action is brought.
B. If the trier of fact finds that a claimant has suffered a permanent mental
injury that severely impairs the claimant's ability to be employed or enjoy a
reasonable standard of living, general damages shall not be awarded in a delictual
action in an amount in excess of one million dollars, regardless of the number of
parties against whom the action is brought.
C. The limitations on general damages imposed by Paragraph A and
Paragraph B of this Article do not apply if the trier of fact finds that the claimant has
suffered permanent and severe physical injury, including a substantial physical
abnormality or disfigurement, loss of use of a limb, loss of or substantial impairment
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1138 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 526
to a major body organ or system, or an injury that renders the claimant permanently
incapable of independent self-care or the ability to perform life-sustaining activities.
D. The limitations on general damages imposed by Paragraph A and
Paragraph B of this Article do not apply if the trier of fact finds by clear and
convincing evidence that the tortfeasor's actions were intentional or malicious.